Hawaii statutes.
§88-325 Employee contributions. (a)
Each class H member, who became a member before July 1, 2012, shall contribute
six per cent of the member's compensation to the annuity savings fund; provided
that each sewer worker, water safety officer, and emergency medical technician
who became a member before July 1, 2012, and is a class H member shall
contribute nine and three-fourths per cent of the member's compensation to the
annuity savings fund for service in that capacity.

(b) Each class H member, who becomes a member
after June 30, 2012, shall contribute eight per cent of the member's
compensation to the annuity savings fund; provided that each sewer worker,
water safety officer, and emergency medical technician who becomes a member
after June 30, 2012, and is a class H member shall contribute eleven and
three-fourths per cent of the member's compensation to the annuity savings fund
for service in that capacity. [L 2004, c 179, pt of §1; am L 2011, c 163, §12]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next